apertium-bn-en.bn.dix
    <pardef n="হ/াট__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটছিলাম</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটছিল</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েটে</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="pcnd" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েটেছেন</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="prft" /><s n="p2" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটবে</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটল</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েটেছিল</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="ppst" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটবেন</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটবে</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটবেন</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েটেছে</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="prft" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটবে</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="imp" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটলি</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটছে</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াট</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটতে থাকব</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েটেছিল</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="plprft" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটবেন</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটছিল</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটব</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েটেছিল</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="plprft" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটতে</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="inf" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েটেছিলাম</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="plprft" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটলে</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p2" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটলে</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটতে থাকবেন</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটিস</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটি</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটছি</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটছিলি</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটলেন</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটবে</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটা</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="ger" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটতেন</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="hbtl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াট</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটিস</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটত</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="hbtl" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটতে থাকবে</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটছিস</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াট</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েটেছিলেন</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="plprft" /><s n="p2" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটছিলে</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটছ</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>াটতে থাকবেন</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েটেছিস</l>
          <r>াট<s n="vblex" /><s n="prft" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />

    <e lm="হাট">
      <i>হ</i>
      <par n="হ/াট__vblex" />
    </e>
    <e lm="কাট">
      <i>ক</i>
      <par n="হ/াট__vblex" />
    </e>
